Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1124
Construction of act.

Nothing contained in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of the civil rights law, any other law of this state, or any municipal ordinance relating to discrimination because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, disability, national origin, or military or veteran status.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 24, p. 797;

Laws 1973, LB 266, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 360, § 18;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 90.